Missouri, session 2026, HB2838.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 370.081 and 370.357, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 370.081 and 370.357, to read as follows:
370.081. 1. A credit union may add to its membership additional groups or
geographic areas that comply with the provisions of subsection 2 of section 370.080 if the
credit union meets the criteria set forth in this section.
2. Except as provided in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection, and
subsections 3 and 4 of this section, only employer groups with fewer than three thousand
members shall be eligible to be included in the credit union's field of membership, unless:
(1) Any employer group which the commission determines, in writing and in
accordance with the guidelines it has set forth, could not feasibly or reasonably establish a
new single common-bond credit union because:
(a) The employer group lacks sufficient volunteer or other resources to support the
efficient and effective operation of a credit union;
(b) The employer group does not meet the criteria which the commission has
determined to be important for the likelihood of success in establishing and maintaining a
new credit union;
(c) The employer group would be unlikely to operate a safe and sound credit union;
(2) The groups are involved in an involuntary merger or when the director acts as a
conservator or liquidating agent; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2838 2
(3) The groups are transferred from another credit union in connection with a merger
or consolidation approved by the director, provided when making this determination the
director shall:
(a) Determine whether the service area of the merging credit union is contiguous to
the area served by the continuing credit union;
(b) Assess the breadth of the service area of the combined credit unions;
(c) Assess the ability of the continuing credit union to serve the combined area; and
(d) Assess the number of voluntary mergers the acquiring credit union has requested,
or received approval for, during the five-year period preceding the proposed merger.
3. The director shall not permit state-chartered credit unions to merge without a
thorough assessment by the director that the combined field of membership is consistent with
this chapter and is reasonable in terms of size, service area, and geographic location.
4. Upon approval by the director of a merger of two or more credit unions, the
field of membership of the surviving credit union shall include the field of membership
of the surviving credit union and each of the merged credit unions.
[3.] 5. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of section 370.080, the director of the division of
credit unions may allow the membership of a credit union serving groups of occupation,
association or employer to include any person within a proximate geographic area if:
(1) Such an area meets the definition of a low-income or underserved community as
defined by the credit union commission or the National Credit Union Administration;
(2) A merger or consolidation has been approved by the director of the division of
credit unions which involves any geographic area credit union.
[4.] 6. The credit union may apply and receive approval from the director of the
division of credit unions to include the proposed new occupation, employer, or association
groups or geographic areas in the credit union's membership. In the case of a new credit
union application, the organizers of such credit union as provided in subsection 1 of section
370.080 shall specify the membership group selected as provided in subsection 2 of section
370.080. If an existing credit union applies for a field of membership expansion, such credit
union shall select either a geographic area or occupation, employer, or association group as
provided in subsection 2 of section 370.080 which shall be binding for all future expansions.
When a credit union serving occupation, association, or employer groups has converted to a
geographic area credit union, that credit union shall not accept as members new groups that
are headquartered outside the geographic area of the credit union, or new employees or new
members of those groups who work or reside outside the geographic area of the credit union.
Upon receipt of an application from a credit union to include a new group or new geographic
area in its membership, and no later than five business days after an application has been
received, the director shall cause notice of the application to be published in the division's

HB 2838 3
electronic bulletin and sent electronically to any party who has requested notification of such
applications. From the date such notice is published, there shall be a ten-business-day
comment period during which any person or entity desiring to do so may comment on such
proposal in writing. Comments received shall become a part of the credit union's application
file, subject to public inspection and copying. Within ten days after the comment period ends,
the director of the division of credit unions shall issue a decision either granting or rejecting
the credit union's application and stating the reasons therefor. In addition to any other
requirements required by law or rule, prior to granting the application, the director of the
division of credit unions shall determine that:
(1) The credit union has the immediate ability to serve the additional group or
geographic area. In making this determination, the director shall consider the data required to
be reported on an annual basis by the state-chartered credit unions that includes aggregated
information about the census tracts in which members reside, the actual or estimated annual
income of members, and types and numbers of loans or extensions of credit for which
members received approval. For the purposes of this section, the term "member data" shall
mean information on the income levels of credit union members that credit unions are
required to report; provided, however, that no member data includes the names, account
numbers, or taxpayer identification numbers. In the event that the National Credit Union
Administration (NCUA) has a regulation on member data reporting requirements, the state
annual member data report shall be made consistent with NCUA reporting requirements. The
director shall determine the nonproprietary data to be included in the annual member data
report which shall be made available to the public.
(2) No later than five business days after an expansion or merger has been granted,
the director shall cause the decision and findings to be published in the division's electronic
bulletin and sent electronically to any party who has requested notification of such actions.
[5.] 7. Within fifteen days after the decision is published, any person or entity with an
interest different from that of a member of the general public, upon establishing that such
person or entity may be aggrieved based upon competent and substantial evidence of potential
actual damages, shall have the right to contest the decision by appealing the decision to the
credit union commission utilizing the procedure as set out in section 370.063. If the
commission finds that the decision or the findings of the director of the division of credit
unions was arbitrary and capricious or not based on evidence in the director's possession, the
commission shall set aside the findings and decision of the director of the division of credit
unions and enter its own findings and decision. Any party in the proceeding before the
commission who has exhausted all administrative remedies provided by law may appeal the
decision to the circuit court of Cole County.

HB 2838 4
[6.] 8. Subject to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the director of the division
of credit unions shall have the authority to approve applications to amend bylaws regarding
credit union membership or to organize credit unions that include single or multiple groups.
370.357. When the merger or consolidation has been effected:
(1) The several credit unions parties to the plan of merger or consolidation shall be a
single credit union which, in the case of a merger, shall be that credit union designated in the
plan of merger as the surviving credit union, and, in the case of consolidation, shall be the
new credit union provided for in the plan of consolidation;
(2) The separate existence of all credit union parties to the plan of merger or
consolidation, except the surviving or new credit union, shall cease;
(3) The surviving or new credit union shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities,
and powers, and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of a new credit union;
(4) The surviving or new credit union shall thereupon and thereafter possess all the
rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises of each of the merging or consolidating credit
unions; and all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due on whatever account,
loans, and all other choses in action, and all and every other interest of or belonging to or due
to each of the credit unions so merged or consolidated, shall be taken and deemed to be
transferred to and vested in the single credit union, without further act or deed; and the title to
any real estate, or any interest therein, under the laws of this state, vested in any of the credit
unions, shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of the merger or consolidation;
(5) The surviving or new credit union shall thenceforth be responsible and liable for
all the liabilities and obligations of each of the credit unions so merged or consolidated; and
any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against any of such credit unions
may be prosecuted to judgment as if the merger or consolidation had not taken place, or the
surviving or new credit union may be substituted in its place; neither the rights of creditors
nor any liens upon the property of any of the corporations shall be impaired by the merger or
consolidation;
(6) In case of a merger, the articles of agreement and the bylaws of the surviving
credit union shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in its articles
are stated in the articles of merger; and, in the case of a consolidation, the statement set forth
in the articles of consolidation, and which are required or permitted to be set forth in the
bylaws of credit unions, shall be deemed to be the articles of agreement of the new credit
union.

HB 2838 5
(7) The surviving or new credit union shall be authorized to retain and continue
to serve all members of each of the merging or consolidating credit unions without
requiring reapplication or requalification for membership.
✔